el: Επίπεδο προστασίας θήκης πλήκτρων: Πτήσης/δρόμου (στυλ ATA); Σκληρό διαμορφωμένο περίβλημα; Ενισχυμένο σκληρό περίβλημα; Άλλο
hu: Billentyűzet tok védelmi szintje: Repülő/turné (ATA-stílusú); Öntött kemény borítás; Megerősített kemény borítás; Egyéb
zh-TW: 鍵盤琴箱防護等級: 航空/公路 (ATA 風格); 模製硬殼; 加固硬殼; 其他
pt-BR: Case para teclado nível de proteção: Voo/estrada (estilo ATA); Casco rígido moldado; Casco rígido reforçado; Outro
ro-RO: Nivelul de protecție al carcasei pentru claviatură: Pentru zbor/turneu (stil ATA); Carcasă rigidă turnată; Carcasă rigidă ranforsată; Altele
fr: Niveau de protection de l’étui pour clavier: Vol/route (style ATA); Coque rigide moulée; Coque rigide renforcée; Autre
sv: Skyddsnivå för tangentbordsfodral: Flyg/väg (ATA-stil); Formgjutet hårt skal; Förstärkt hårt skal; Övrigt
nb: Beskyttelsesnivå for keyboardkoffert: Flightcase (ATA-stil); Støpt hardt skall; Forsterket hardt skall; Annet
ru: Уровень защиты кейса для клавишных: Дорожный/полетный (стандарт ATA); Формованный жесткий корпус; Усиленный жесткий корпус; Другое
it: Livello di protezione della custodia per tastiera: Flight/road case (stile ATA); Guscio rigido sagomato; Guscio rigido rinforzato; Altro
sk-SK: Úroveň ochrany puzdra na klávesy: Letový/cestný (štýl ATA); Tvarovaná pevná škrupina; Vystužená pevná škrupina; Iné
tr: Klavye koruma seviyesi: Uçuş/yol (ATA stili); Kalıplı sert dış yüzey; Güçlendirilmiş sert dış yüzey; Diğer
cs: Úroveň ochrany pouzdra klávesnice: Letecké/cestovní (styl ATA); Tvarovaná tvrdá skořepina; Zesílená tvrdá skořepina; Jiné
zh-CN: 键盘包防护等级: 航空/公路（ATA 风格）; 模压硬壳; 加固硬壳; 其他
en: Keyboard case protection level: Flight/road (ATA-style); Molded hard shell; Reinforced hard shell; Other
pl: Poziom ochrony futerału na keyboard: Transport lotniczy/drogowy (w stylu ATA); Profilowana twarda skorupa; Wzmocniona twarda skorupa; Inny
pt-PT: Nível de proteção do estojo para teclado: Voo/estrada (estilo ATA); Estrutura rígida moldada; Estrutura rígida reforçada; Outro
vi: Mức độ bảo vệ hộp bàn phím: Di chuyển (kiểu ATA); Vỏ cứng đúc; Vỏ cứng được gia cố; Khác
ja: キーボードケースの保護レベル: フライト/ロード (ATA スタイル); 成形ハードシェル; 補強ハードシェル; その他
nl: Keyboardcase beschermingsniveau: Flight/road (ATA-stijl); Voorgevormde harde schaal; Versterkte harde schaal; Anders
th: ระดับการป้องกันของเคสคีย์บอร์ด: สำหรับเดินทาง (สไตล์ ATA); ฮาร์ดเชลล์ขึ้นรูป; ฮาร์ดเชลล์เสริมความแข็งแรง; อื่นๆ
es: Nivel de protección del estuche para teclado: Para viajes/giras (estilo ATA); Funda rígida moldeada; Funda rígida reforzada; Otro
sl-SI: Stopnja zaščite kovčka za klaviature: Leteče/cestno (slog ATA); Oblikovana trda zunanjost; Ojačana trda zunanjost; Drugo
de: Schutzklasse des Keyboardkoffers: Flightcase (ATA-Stil); Geformte Hartschale; Verstärkte Hartschale; Sonstige
bg-BG: Ниво на защита на калъфа за клавир: За пътуване (тип ATA); Формован твърд корпус; Подсилен твърд корпус; Друго
da: Keyboardetuiets beskyttelsesniveau: Flight-/roadcase (ATA-stil); Støbt hård skal; Forstærket hård skal; Andet
lt-LT: Klavišinio dėklo apsaugos lygis: Skrydžiams / kelionėms (ATA stiliaus); Lietas kietas korpusas; Sustiprintas kietas korpusas; Kita
fi: Kosketinsoittimen kotelon suojaustaso: Lento/kiertue (ATA-tyyppinen); Muotoiltu kova kuori; Vahvistettu kova kuori; Muu
hr-HR: Razina zaštite tipkovnice kutija: Zrakoplovni/cestovni (ATA stil); Oblikovani tvrdi oklop; Ojačani tvrdi oklop; Ostalo
ko: 키보드 케이스 보호 수준: 비행/육로(ATA 스타일); 성형 하드 쉘; 강화 하드 쉘; 기타